Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3605.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2112, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Criminal vehicular homicide. (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), a person is guilty of criminal vehicular homicide and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than deleted text begin tendeleted text end new text begin 25new text end years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both, if the person causes the death of a human being not constituting murder or manslaughter as a result of operating a motor vehicle: (1) in a grossly negligent manner; (2) in a negligent manner while under the influence of: (i) alcohol; (ii) a controlled substance; (iii) cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, a hemp-derived consumer product, artificially derived cannabinoids, or tetrahydrocannabinols; or (iv) any combination of those elements; (3) while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more; (4) while having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more, as measured within two hours of the time of driving; (5) in a negligent manner while under the influence of an intoxicating substance and the person knows or has reason to know that the substance has the capacity to cause impairment; (6) in a negligent manner while any amount of a controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II, or its metabolite, other than cannabis flower, a cannabis product, a lower-potency hemp edible, a hemp-derived consumer product, artificially derived cannabinoids, or tetrahydrocannabinols, is present in the person's body; (7) where the driver who causes the collision leaves the scene of the collision in violation of section 169.09, subdivision 1 or 6; or (8) where the driver had actual knowledge that a peace officer had previously issued a citation or warning that the motor vehicle was defectively maintained, the driver had actual knowledge that remedial action was not taken, the driver had reason to know that the defect created a present danger to others, and the death was caused by the defective maintenance. (b) If a person is sentenced under paragraph (a) for a violation under paragraph (a), clauses (2) to (6), occurring within ten years of a qualified prior driving offense, the deleted text begin statutory maximum sentence ofdeleted text end new text begin person may be sentenced tonew text end imprisonment deleted text begin is 15deleted text end new text begin for not more than 30new text end yearsnew text begin or to the payment of a fine of not more than $30,000, or bothnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to violations committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2112, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Driver training programs. new text end new text begin The commissioner of public safety shall adopt rules requiring thorough instruction concerning this section for persons enrolled in driver training programs offered at public, private, and parochial schools and commercial driver training schools. The instruction must encompass at least the penalties for violating this section. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin VEHICULAR HOMICIDE AWARENESS.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for programs to raise public awareness of the dangers associated with driving under the influence of alcohol, including but not limited to the penalties for violation of section 609.2112 (criminal vehicular homicide). new text end